HurFST/LexicalMorphonology/LexicalMorphonology.foma
source ../CharacterClasses/CharacterClasses.foma
define SingleCoronalResonant P (B) [r|l|n] - [r (B) r|l (B) l|n (B) n];
define RelatorOrModal [{nē}|{ne}|{n(e)}] "-" | [{na}|{n(a)}|l|{le}] ["-"|.#.];
define Derivational "+" [{ġe}|{ni}|{ži}];
define Elision [a|e|i] -> "(" ... ")" || SingleCoronalResonant (B) _ "-" RelatorOrModal | Derivational;
define EmbrV "(" [a|e|i] ")";
define EmbrR "(" [l|n] ">" ")";
define lnAssimilation [l|n] -> {(} ... {>)r} || r (Boundary) (EmbrV) "-" _ ,,
						n -> {(} ... {>)l} || l (Boundary) (EmbrV) "-" _ ;
define Anaptyxis [..] -> ɑ || C _ (B) n EmbrV "-" n | l EmbrV "-" EmbrR l | r EmbrV "-" EmbrR r;
define DerivAnaptyxis [..] -> ɑ || V C _ C (EmbrV) Derivational;
define RegrVowelAssim [ɑ|ɛ|ɪ|ɔ] -> a || _ "=" [[{tt}|{nn}|{dill}|{ll}] A|{d}|{n}|{dil}|{l}];
define Specification ɛ -> e, ɪ -> i, ɔ -> o || _ ;
define VowelHarmony	ɑ -> a || A [C|"-"]* _ ,, ɑ -> e || E [C|"-"]* _ ,,
					ɑ -> i || I [C|"-"]* _ ,, ɑ -> O || O [C|"-"]* _ ,,
					ɑ -> u || U [C|"-"]* _ ;
define vDeletion v -> "(" ... ")" || [ž|z] "-" _ ;
define vAssimilation v -> w || U "-" _ ;
define ErgativeSuffixDeletion ("-") ž @-> "(" ... ")" || _ "=" [[{tt}|{mm}|{dill}|{ll}] A|{d}|{m}|{dil}|{l}];
define CompensatoryLengthening a -> ā, e -> ē, i-> ī, o -> ō, u -> ū || _ "(" ("-") ž ")";
define Epenthesis [..] -> {+i} || {-en} | {-dan} _ "=" [[{tt}|{mm}|{dill}|{ff}|{ll}] A|{d}|{m}|{dil}|{v}|{l}];
define nTriple n -> "(" ... ")" || _ B {nn};
define CliticContraction {a=a} -> {(a)=ā} || _ n;
define PartialDevoicing d -> t, ž -> š || Obstruent ("-"|"=") _ , _ ("-"|"=") Obstruent;
define Voicing p -> b, t -> d, k -> g, f -> v, š -> ž, ḫ -> ġ || V (Boundary) _ (Boundary) V ,
														_ (Boundary) R , R (Boundary)_ , _ .#.;
define LexicalMorphonology Elision .o. lnAssimilation .o. Anaptyxis .o.
	DerivAnaptyxis .o. RegrVowelAssim .o. Specification .o. VowelHarmony .o.
	vDeletion .o. vAssimilation .o.
	ErgativeSuffixDeletion .o. CompensatoryLengthening .o. Epenthesis .o.
	nTriple .o. CliticContraction .o. PartialDevoicing .o. Voicing;
